District of Columbia statutes.
16-4202

Scope.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) or (c) of this section, this chapter applies to a mediation in which:

(1)

The mediation parties are required to mediate by statute or court or administrative agency rule or referred to mediation by a court, administrative agency, or arbitrator;

(2)

The mediation parties and the mediator agree to mediate in a record that demonstrates an expectation that mediation communications will be privileged against disclosure; or

(3)

The mediation parties use as a mediator an individual who holds himself or herself out as a mediator or the mediation is provided by a person that holds itself out as providing mediation.

(b)

The chapter does not apply to a mediation:

(1)

Relating to the establishment, negotiation, administration, or termination of a collective bargaining relationship;

(2)

Relating to a dispute that is pending under or is part of the processes established by a collective bargaining agreement, except that the chapter applies to a mediation arising out of a dispute that has been filed with an administrative agency or court;

(3)

Conducted by a judge who might make a ruling on the case; or

(4)

Conducted under the auspices of:

(A)

A primary or secondary school, if all the mediation parties are students;

(B)

A correctional institution for youths, if all the mediation parties are residents of that institution; or

(C)

The Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia or the Mayor, if the mediation arises from a consumer complaint under authority of Chapter 39 of Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code, and one of the mediation parties is the consumer complainant.

(c)

If the mediation parties agree in advance in a signed record, or a record of proceeding reflects agreement by the parties, that all or part of a mediation is not privileged, the privileges under §§ 16-4203 through 16-4205 shall not apply to the mediation or part agreed upon; provided, that §§ 16-4203 through 16-4205 shall apply to a mediation communication made by a person that has not received actual notice of the agreement before the communication is made.

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-87, § 2(b), 53 DCR 1075
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 3 of the Uniform Mediation Act.
This section is referenced in § 16-4210.